Maryland, session 2026, HB0215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
10–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Department” means the Department of Aging.
(f) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Aging.
10–407.
This part applies only to continuing care in a retirement community operations.
10–417.
(A) AT LEAST ONCE A YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONDUCT A
FINANCIAL STRESS TEST FOR A PROVIDER.
(B) THE FINANCIAL STRESS TEST CONDUCTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL EXAMINE THE PROVIDER’S:
(1) COMMUNITY OCCUPANCY RATES;
(2) NET OPERATING MARGIN;
(3) LIQUIDITY;
(4) CAPITAL STRUCTURE;
(5) OPERATING RATIO;

HOUSE BILL 215 3
(6) DEBT SERVICE COVERAGE;
(7) AVERAGE AGE OF COMMUNITY INFRASTRUCTURE AND ASSETS;
(8) CUSHION RATIO;
(9) CASH TO DEBT RATIO;
(10) RISK FROM CURRENT AND PROPOSED INVESTMENTS;
(11) CORPORATE STRUCTURE;
(12) INTERSTATE FINANCIAL TRANSACTIONS; AND
(13) ANY OTHER INDICATOR OF FINANCIAL PERFORMANCE AND
DURABILITY SELECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL HIRE TWO ANALYSTS TO:
(1) PERFORM THE FINANCIAL STRESS TESTS REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SECTION; AND
(2) PREPARE REPORTS ON THE FINANCIAL STRESS TESTS FOR THE
DEPARTMENT.
(D) (1) AFTER REVIEWING A FINANCIAL STRESS TEST REPORT PREPARED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT’S FINANCIAL REVIEW
COMMITTEE SHALL ASSIGN A GRADE TO INDICATE THE FINANCIAL STABILITY OF
THE PROVIDER.
(2) THE GRADE ASSIGNED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE.
10–426.
(a) (1) At least quarterly[, each]:
(I) EACH CONTINUING CARE AT HOME provider shall hold a
meeting open to all of the provider’s subscribers; AND
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, EACH
CONTINUING CARE IN A RETIREMENT COMMUNITY PROVIDER SHALL HOLD A
MEETING WITH THE PROVIDER’S RESIDENT ASSOCIATION.

HOUSE BILL 215
(2) (I) A PROVIDER MAY DETERMINE WHETHER A MEETING WITH
THE RESIDENT ASSOCIATION AS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS OPEN TO ALL OF THE PROVIDER’S SUBSCRIBERS.
(II) AT LEAST TWICE A YEAR, A MEETING HELD IN ACCORDANCE
WITH PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE HELD IN PERSON AT THE
FACILITY REPRESENTED BY THE RESIDENT ASSOCIATION.
(b) At the meetings, an authorized officer of the provider shall:
(1) summarize the provider’s operations, significant changes from the
previous year, and goals and objectives for the next year; and
(2) answer subscribers’ questions.
(c) At the last quarterly meeting of the year, an authorized officer of the provider
shall provide an aggregated, deidentified summary of internal grievances submitted under
§ 10–428 of this subtitle.
(D) A COPY OF THE AGENDAS AND MINUTES OF MEETINGS REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE TO THE PROVIDER’S
SUBSCRIBERS.
10–427.
(a) (1) If a provider has a governing body, at least one of the provider’s
subscribers shall be a full and regular member of the governing body.
(2) If the provider owns or operates more than three facilities in the State,
the governing body shall include at least one of the provider’s subscribers for every three
facilities in the State.
(3) (i) If the governing body has only one subscriber, the governing body
shall authorize [the appointment of] an alternate subscriber to serve as a regular member
of the governing body if the regular subscriber is unable to fulfill the subscriber’s duties.
(ii) The alternate subscriber may:
1. attend all meetings of the governing body; and
2. vote only if the regular subscriber is unable to fulfill the
subscriber’s duties as a regular member of the governing body.
(4) [Subject to paragraph (5) of this subsection, a] A regular or alternate
member of the governing body who is selected to meet the requirements of this subsection
shall be a subscriber at a facility in the State and be [selected according to the same general

HOUSE BILL 215 5
written standards and criteria used to select other members of the governing body]
ELECTED BY THE RESIDENT ASSOCIATION OF THE FACILITY.
(5) [The governing body shall confer with the resident association at each
of the provider’s facilities before the subscriber or alternate subscriber officially joins the
governing body] IF MEMBERS OF THE GOVERNING BODY HAVE DIFFERENT POWERS
AND RESPONSIBILITIES REGARDING ASSET CONTROL AND FINANCIAL
CONSEQUENCES FOR SUBSCRIBERS, A SUBSCRIBER MEMBER ELECTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL HAVE AT LEAST THE SAME POWERS
AND RESPONSIBILITIES AS THE OTHER MEMBERS WHO HOLD THE MOST POWERS
AND RESPONSIBILITIES REGARDING ASSET CONTROL AND FINANCIAL
CONSEQUENCES FOR SUBSCRIBERS.
(6) (i) A subscriber member or alternate subscriber member of a
governing body may report on nonconfidential deliberations, actions, and policies of the
governing body to the resident association.
(ii) The governing body in its sole but reasonable discretion shall
determine whether a matter is confidential.
(7) The Secretary may waive the requirements of this subsection for a
provider in the process of decertifying as a provider, if the Secretary determines that there
are no subscribers willing and able to serve on the governing body.
(b) (1) If a provider does not have a governing body, the provider shall appoint
a select committee of its officers or partners to meet at least quarterly with the resident
association at each of its facilities to address concerns of the subscribers and to ensure that
the opinions of subscribers are relayed to all officers or partners of the provider.
(2) If a facility does not have a resident association, the committee shall
meet with a reasonable number of representatives, not required to exceed fifteen, that the
subscribers elect.
(c) As determined by the provider’s governing body, the provider shall make
available to subscribers either the nonconfidential portions of the minutes of each meeting
of the governing body or a summary of the nonconfidential portions of the minutes, within
1 month of approval of the minutes.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.